Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201664-309
Performance of electronic notarial act; components.

In performing an electronic notarial act, all of the following components shall be attached to, or logically associated with, the electronic document by the electronic notary public and shall be immediately perceptible and reproducible in the electronic document to which the notary public’s electronic signature is attached: (1) The electronic notary seal; (2) the notary public’s electronic signature; and (3) the completed wording of one of the following notarial certificates: (a) Acknowledgment, (b) jurat, (c) verification or proof, or (d) oath or affirmation.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 9.
July 1, 2017